Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1312
Federal funds; administration; coordination; allocation.

(1) Any political subdivision of the state that allocates funds received under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 for eligible broadband infrastructure projects may coordinate with the commission by mutual consent to administer such federal funds in a manner consistent with the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act.

(2) In administering federal funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the commission may allocate such funds received for eligible projects awarded grants under subdivision (1)(c) of section 81-12,245 to any portion of a local exchange area containing a city of the second class or village.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 11;

Laws 2023, LB683, § 28.